hi-misc.dic
मुझको
मुझे
मुझपर
तुझको
तुझे
तुझसे
इसको
इसे
उसको
उसे
उसके
हमको
हमें
हमपर
तुमको
तुम्हें
इनको
इन्हें
उनको
उन्हें
ही
यह
यही
वह
वही
ये
यही
वे
वही
इस
इसी
उस
उसी
इन
इन्हीं
उन
उन्हीं
उच्च/11
उत्कृष्ट/11
कठोर/11
गुरु/11
तीव्र/11
न्यून/11
मधुर/11
महान/11
लघु/11
विशाल/11
सुंदर/11
स्वस्थ/11
स्पष्ट/11
सूक्ष्म/11
सुन्दर/11
सुदूर/11
सरल/11
समीप/11
सफल/11
संपन्न/11
श्रेष्ठ/11
शुद्ध/11
शुचि/11
शीघ्र/11
व्यस्त/11
वृहत्/11
वीर्य/11
विदुत्/11
वरिष्ठ/11
मधुर/11
भीषण/11
भव्य/11
भयंकर/11
बृहत्/11
बाह्य/11
बहु/11
प्रिय/11
प्राचीन/11
प्रसिद्ध/11
प्रमुख/11
प्रबल/11
प्रचंड/11
प्रगाढ़/11
पूर्व/11
पूर्ण/11
पवित्र/11
न्यून/11
नूतन/11
नीच/11
निश्चित/11
निम्न/11
निकृष्ट/11
निकट/11
नवीन/11
दुष्ट/11
दुर्लभ/11
दिव्य/11
चपल/11
घनिष्ठ/11
गहन/11
गंभीर/11
कनिष्ठ/11
उत्तर/11
उत्तम/11
इष्ट/11
आधुनिक/11
आत्मीय/11
आंतरिक/11
अल्प/11
अभिन्न/11
अन्य/11
अनन्य/11
अनुकूल/11
अधुना/11
अधिक/11
अधम/11
अग्रिम/11
अग्र/11
अंध/11
निर्बल/11
सबल/11
शुद्ध/11
दृढ़/11
निज/11
कृपण/11
मूर्ख/11
वीर/11
कुशल/11
योग्य/11
निपुण/11
शिष्ट/11
प्रिय/11
अध्यक्ष/201
आचार्य/203
आप/97,98,99
इस/96,97,98
उस/96,97,98
किस/96,97,98
गाँव/94,95
गाड़ी/94,95
घर/94,95
जिगर/94,95
जिस/96,97,98
टोपी/94,95
तुझ/98
तुम/97,98,99
तू/97
दिल/94,95
दूध/94,95
बाहर/94,95
मंत्री/202
मुझ/98
शहर/94,95
हम/97,98,99
कमल/101,102,103
सीता/101
श्याम/102
रंजना/103
